motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
SFX ( N 400 # numeri ordinali 3#3
SFX ( 0 decimo .
SFX ( 0 decimi .
SFX ( 0 decima .
SFX ( 0 decime .
SFX ( 0 undicesimo .
SFX ( 0 undicesimi .
SFX ( 0 undicesima .
SFX ( 0 undicesime .
SFX ( 0 dodicesimo .
SFX ( 0 dodicesimi .
SFX ( 0 dodicesima .
SFX ( 0 dodicesime .
SFX ( 0 tredicesimo .
SFX ( 0 tredicesimi .
SFX ( 0 tredicesima .
SFX ( 0 tredicesime .
SFX ( 0 quattordicesimo .
SFX ( 0 quattordicesimi .
SFX ( 0 quattordicesima .
SFX ( 0 quattordicesime .
SFX ( 0 quindicesimo .
SFX ( 0 quindicesimi .
SFX ( 0 quindicesima .
SFX ( 0 quindicesime .
SFX ( 0 sedicesimo .
SFX ( 0 sedicesimi .
SFX ( 0 sedicesima .
SFX ( 0 sedicesime .
SFX ( 0 diciassettesimo .
SFX ( 0 diciassettesimi .
SFX ( 0 diciassettesima .
SFX ( 0 diciassettesime .
SFX ( 0 diciottesimo .
SFX ( 0 diciottesimi .
SFX ( 0 diciottesima .
SFX ( 0 diciottesime .
SFX ( 0 diciannovesimo .
SFX ( 0 diciannovesimi .
SFX ( 0 diciannovesima .
SFX ( 0 diciannovesime .
SFX ( 0 ventesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventesima .
SFX ( 0 ventesime .
SFX ( 0 ventunesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventunesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventunesima .
SFX ( 0 ventunesime .
SFX ( 0 ventiduesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventiduesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventiduesima .
SFX ( 0 ventiduesime .
SFX ( 0 ventitreesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventitreesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventitreesima .
SFX ( 0 ventitreesime .
SFX ( 0 ventiquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 ventiquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 ventiquattresima .
SFX ( 0 ventiquattresime .
SFX ( 0 venticinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 venticinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 venticinquesima .
SFX ( 0 venticinquesime .
SFX ( 0 ventiseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventiseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventiseiesima .
SFX ( 0 ventiseiesime .
SFX ( 0 ventisettesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventisettesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventisettesima .
SFX ( 0 ventisettesime .
SFX ( 0 ventottoesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventottoesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventottoesima .
SFX ( 0 ventottoesime .
SFX ( 0 ventinovesimo .
SFX ( 0 ventinovesimi .
SFX ( 0 ventinovesima .
SFX ( 0 ventinovesime .
SFX ( 0 trentesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentesima .
SFX ( 0 trentesime .
SFX ( 0 trentunesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentunesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentunesima .
SFX ( 0 trentunesime .
SFX ( 0 trentaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentaduesima .
SFX ( 0 trentaduesime .
SFX ( 0 trentatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentatreesima .
SFX ( 0 trentatreesime .
SFX ( 0 trentaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 trentaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 trentaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 trentaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 trentacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 trentacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 trentaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 trentaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 trentasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentasettesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentasettesima .
SFX ( 0 trentasettesime .
SFX ( 0 trentottesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentottesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentottesima .
SFX ( 0 trentottesime .
SFX ( 0 trentanovesimo .
SFX ( 0 trentanovesimi .
SFX ( 0 trentanovesime .
SFX ( 0 trentanovesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantunesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantunesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantunesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantunesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantaduesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantaduesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantatreesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantatreesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 quarantaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 quarantacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantasettesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantasettesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantasettesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantottesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantottesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantottesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantottesime .
SFX ( 0 quarantanovesimo .
SFX ( 0 quarantanovesimi .
SFX ( 0 quarantanovesima .
SFX ( 0 quarantanovesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantunesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantunesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantunesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantunesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaduesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaduesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantatreesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantatreesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantasettesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantasettesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantasettesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantottesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantottesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantottesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantottesime .
SFX ( 0 cinquantanovesimo .
SFX ( 0 cinquantanovesimi .
SFX ( 0 cinquantanovesima .
SFX ( 0 cinquantanovesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantunesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantunesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantunesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantunesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantaduesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantaduesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantatreesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantatreesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 sessantaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 sessantacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantasettesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantasettesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantasettesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantottesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantottesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantottesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantottesime .
SFX ( 0 sessantanovesimo .
SFX ( 0 sessantanovesimi .
SFX ( 0 sessantanovesima .
SFX ( 0 sessantanovesime .
SFX ( 0 settantesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantesima .
SFX ( 0 settantesime .
SFX ( 0 settantunesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantunesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantunesima .
SFX ( 0 settantunesime .
SFX ( 0 settantaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantaduesima .
SFX ( 0 settantaduesime .
SFX ( 0 settantatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantatreesima .
SFX ( 0 settantatreesime .
SFX ( 0 settantaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 settantaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 settantaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 settantaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 settantacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 settantacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 settantaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 settantaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 settantasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantasettesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantasettesima .
SFX ( 0 settantasettesime .
SFX ( 0 settantottesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantottesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantottesima .
SFX ( 0 settantottesime .
SFX ( 0 settantanovesimo .
SFX ( 0 settantanovesimi .
SFX ( 0 settantanovesima .
SFX ( 0 settantanovesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantunesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantunesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantunesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantunesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantaduesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantaduesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantaduesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantaduesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantatreesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantatreesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantatreesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantatreesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantaquattresimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantaquattresimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantaquattresima .
SFX ( 0 ottantaquattresime .
SFX ( 0 ottantacinquesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantacinquesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantacinquesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantacinquesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantaseiesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantaseiesimi .
SFX ( 0 ottantaseiesima .
SFX ( 0 ottantaseiesime .
SFX ( 0 ottantasettesimo .
SFX ( 0 ottantasettesimi .
